Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 5. THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP AND THE SUIT AFFECTING THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 111. GUIDELINES FOR POSSESSION AND CHILD SUPPORT

Sec. 111.001. REVIEW OF GUIDELINES. (a) Prior to each regular legislative session, the standing committees of each house of the legislature having jurisdiction over family law issues shall review and, if necessary, recommend revisions to the guidelines for possession of and access to a child under Chapter 153. The committee shall report the results of the review and shall include any recommended revisions in the committee's report to the legislature.

(b) At least once every four years, the Title IV-D agency shall review the child support guidelines under Chapter 154 as required by 42 U.S.C. Section 667(a) and 45 C.F.R. Section 302.56 and report the results of the review and any recommendations for any changes to the guidelines and their manner of application to the standing committees of each house of the legislature having jurisdiction over family law issues.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 716), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 175 (S.B. 285), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 111.002. GUIDELINES SUPERSEDE COURT RULES. (a) The guidelines in this title supersede local court rules and rules of the supreme court that conflict with the guidelines.

(b) Notwithstanding other law, the guidelines may not be repealed or modified by a rule adopted by the supreme court.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995.

Sec. 111.003. POSTING GUIDELINES. A copy of the guidelines for possession of and access to a child under Chapter 153 and a copy of the guidelines for the support of a child under Chapter 154 shall be prominently displayed at or near the entrance to the courtroom of every court having jurisdiction of a suit.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995.